North Dakota, session 69, HB1627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - GRANTS
FOR SCHOOL MEALS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the
state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $7,000,000, or so much of the sum as
may be necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of providing grants to
school districts to defray the expenses of providing school meals during the 2026-27 school
year at no cost to students enrolled in public or nonpublic school whose household income does
not exceed three hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
Page No. 1 25.1417.01000